dictionaries/lv_LV/lv_LV.aff
SFX i Y 20
SFX i īt ijos    īt  is:1vpa0
SFX i īt ijies   īt  is:2vpa0
SFX i īt ijās    īt  is:3xpa0
SFX i īt ijāmies īt  is:1dpa0
SFX i īt ijāties īt  is:2dpa0
SFX i irt īros    irt is:1vpa0
SFX i irt īries   irt is:2vpa0
SFX i irt īrās    irt is:3xpa0
SFX i irt īrāmies irt is:1dpa0
SFX i irt īrāties irt is:2dpa0
SFX i st dos    st is:1vpa0
SFX i st dies   st is:2vpa0
SFX i st dās    st is:3xpa0
SFX i st dāmies st is:1dpa0
SFX i st dāties st is:2dpa0
SFX i iet ejos    iet is:1vpa0
SFX i iet ejies   iet is:2vpa0
SFX i iet ejās    iet is:3xpa0
SFX i iet ejāmies iet is:1dpa0
SFX i iet ejāties iet is:2dpa0


SFX e Y 225
SFX e kt  cos    kt   is:1vpa0
SFX e kt  cies   kt   is:2vpa0
SFX e kt  cās    kt   is:3xpa0
SFX e kt  cāmies kt   is:1dpa0
SFX e kt  cāties kt   is:2dpa0
SFX e gt  dzos    gt  is:1vpa0
SFX e gt  dzies   gt  is:2vpa0
SFX e gt  dzās    gt  is:3xpa0
SFX e gt  dzāmies gt  is:1dpa0
SFX e gt  dzāties gt  is:2dpa0
SFX e elt ēlos    elt is:1vpa0
SFX e elt ēlies   elt is:2vpa0
SFX e elt ēlās    elt is:3xpa0
SFX e elt ēlāmies elt is:1dpa0
SFX e elt ēlāties elt is:2dpa0
SFX e emt ēmos     emt is:1vpa0
SFX e emt ēmies    emt is:2vpa0
SFX e emt ēmās     emt is:3xpa0
SFX e emt ēmāmies  emt is:1dpa0
SFX e emt ēmāties  emt is:2dpa0
SFX e ilt īlos    ilt is:1vpa0
SFX e ilt īlies   ilt is:2vpa0
SFX e ilt īlās    ilt is:3xpa0
SFX e ilt īlāmies ilt is:1dpa0
SFX e ilt īlāties ilt is:2dpa0
SFX e ult ūlos    ult is:1vpa0
SFX e ult ūlies   ult is:2vpa0
SFX e ult ūlās    ult is:3xpa0
SFX e ult ūlāmies ult is:1dpa0
SFX e ult ūlāties ult is:2dpa0
SFX e umt ūmos     umt is:1vpa0
SFX e umt ūmies    umt is:2vpa0
SFX e umt ūmās    umt is:3xpa0
SFX e umt ūmāmies  umt is:1dpa0
SFX e umt ūmāties   umt is:2dpa0
SFX e ūt uvos    [^b]ūt is:1vpa0
SFX e ūt uvies   [^b]ūt is:2vpa0
SFX e ūt uvās   [^b]ūt is:3xpa0
SFX e ūt uvāmies [^b]ūt is:1dpa0
SFX e ūt uvāties  [^b]ūt is:2dpa0
SFX e art āros    art is:1vpa0
SFX e art āries   art is:2vpa0
SFX e art ārās    art is:3xpa0
SFX e art ārāmies art is:1dpa0
SFX e art ārāties art is:2dpa0
SFX e urt ūros    urt is:1vpa0
SFX e urt ūries   urt is:2vpa0
SFX e urt ūrās    urt is:3xpa0
SFX e urt ūrāmies urt is:1dpa0
SFX e urt ūrāties urt is:2dpa0
SFX e irt iros    irt is:1vpa0
SFX e irt iries   irt is:2vpa0
SFX e irt irās    irt is:3xpa0
SFX e irt irāmies irt is:1dpa0
SFX e irt irāties irt is:2dpa0
SFX e ert ēros    ert is:1vpa0
SFX e ert ēries   ert is:2vpa0
SFX e ert ērās    ert is:3xpa0
SFX e ert ērāmies ert is:1dpa0
SFX e ert ērāties ert is:2dpa0
SFX e ot evos    ot is:1vpa0
SFX e ot evies   ot is:2vpa0
SFX e ot evās    ot is:3xpa0
SFX e ot evāmies ot is:1dpa0
SFX e ot evāties ot is:2dpa0
SFX e aut āvos    aut is:1vpa0
SFX e aut āvies   aut is:2vpa0
SFX e aut āvās    aut is:3xpa0
SFX e aut āvāmies aut is:1dpa0
SFX e aut āvāties aut is:2dpa0
SFX e iet ējos    iet is:1vpa0
SFX e iet ējies   iet is:2vpa0
SFX e iet ējās    iet is:3xpa0
SFX e iet ējāmies iet is:1dpa0
SFX e iet ējāties iet is:2dpa0
SFX e īt inos    īt is:1vpa0
SFX e īt inies   īt is:2vpa0
SFX e īt inās    īt is:3xpa0
SFX e īt ināmies īt is:1dpa0
SFX e īt ināties īt is:2dpa0
SFX e st dos    [^aeiīuūlrmn]st is:1vpa0
SFX e st dies   [^aeiīuūlrmn]st is:2vpa0
SFX e st dās    [^aeiīuūlrmn]st is:3xpa0
SFX e st dāmies [^aeiīuūlrmn]st is:1dpa0
SFX e st dāties [^aeiīuūlrmn]st is:2dpa0
SFX e st dos    [^p][r]ast is:1vpa0
SFX e st dies   [^p][r]ast is:2vpa0
SFX e st dās    [^p][r]ast is:3xpa0
SFX e st dāmies [^p][r]ast is:1dpa0
SFX e st dāties [^p][r]ast is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    [p]rast is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   [p]rast is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    [p]rast is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies [p]rast is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties [p]rast is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    [c]iest is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   [c]iest is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    [c]iest is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies [c]iest is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties [c]iest is:2dpa0
SFX e st dos    [^a]lst is:1vpa0
SFX e st dies   [^a]lst is:2vpa0
SFX e st dās    [^a]lst is:3xpa0
SFX e st dāmies [^a]lst is:1dpa0
SFX e st dāties [^a]lst is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    [a]lst is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   [a]lst is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    [a]lst is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies [a]lst is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties [a]lst is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    [lm]est is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   [lm]est is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    [lm]est is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies [lm]est is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties [lm]est is:2dpa0
SFX e st dos    [^c][^lm]est is:1vpa0
SFX e st dies   [^c][^lm]est is:2vpa0
SFX e st dās    [^c][^lm]est is:3xpa0
SFX e st dāmies [^c][^lm]est is:1dpa0
SFX e st dāties [^c][^lm]est is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    [^aģr]ist is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   [^aģr]ist is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    [^aģr]ist is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies [^aģr]ist is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties [^aģr]ist is:2dpa0
SFX e st dos    [ģ]ist is:1vpa0
SFX e st dies   [ģ]ist is:2vpa0
SFX e st dās    [ģ]ist is:3xpa0
SFX e st dāmies [ģ]ist is:1dpa0
SFX e st dāties [ģ]ist is:2dpa0
SFX e st dos    [^k]rist is:1vpa0
SFX e st dies   [^k]rist is:2vpa0
SFX e st dās    [^k]rist is:3xpa0
SFX e st dāmies [^k]rist is:1dpa0
SFX e st dāties [^k]rist is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    [k]rist is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   [k]rist is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    [k]rist is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies [k]rist is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties [k]rist is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    [^l]aist is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   [^l]aist is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    [^l]aist is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies [^l]aist is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties [^l]aist is:2dpa0
SFX e st dos    [l]aist is:1vpa0
SFX e st dies   [l]aist is:2vpa0
SFX e st dās    [l]aist is:3xpa0
SFX e st dāmies [l]aist is:1dpa0
SFX e st dāties [l]aist is:2dpa0
SFX e st dos    [^v]īst is:1vpa0
SFX e st dies   [^v]īst is:2vpa0
SFX e st dās    [^v]īst is:3xpa0
SFX e st dāmies [^v]īst is:1dpa0
SFX e st dāties [^v]īst is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    [^s]vīst is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   [^s]vīst is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    [^s]vīst is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies [^s]vīst is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties [^s]vīst is:2dpa0
SFX e st dos    [s]vīst is:1vpa0
SFX e st dies   [s]vīst is:2vpa0
SFX e st dās    [s]vīst is:3xpa0
SFX e st dāmies [s]vīst is:1dpa0
SFX e st dāties [s]vīst is:2dpa0
SFX e st dos    [^ajsš]ust is:1vpa0
SFX e st dies   [^ajsš]ust is:2vpa0
SFX e st dās    [^ajsš]ust is:3xpa0
SFX e st dāmies [^ajsš]ust is:1dpa0
SFX e st dāties [^ajsš]ust is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    [jsš]ust is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   [jsš]ust is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    [jsš]ust is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies [jsš]ust is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties [jsš]ust is:2dpa0
SFX e st dos    [^j]aust is:1vpa0
SFX e st dies   [^j]aust is:2vpa0
SFX e st dās    [^j]aust is:3xpa0
SFX e st dāmies [^j]aust is:1dpa0
SFX e st dāties [^j]aust is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    [j]aust is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   [j]aust is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    [j]aust is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies [j]aust is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties [j]aust is:2dpa0
SFX e st dos    [^p]ūst is:1vpa0
SFX e st dies   [^p]ūst is:2vpa0
SFX e st dās    [^p]ūst is:3xpa0
SFX e st dāmies [^p]ūst is:1dpa0
SFX e st dāties [^p]ūst is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    [p]ūst is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   [p]ūst is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    [p]ūst is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies [p]ūst is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties [p]ūst is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    nst is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   nst is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    nst is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies nst is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties nst is:2dpa0
SFX e t  os    [^iāē]rst is:1vpa0
SFX e t  ies   [^iāē]rst is:2vpa0
SFX e t  ās    [^iāē]rst is:3xpa0
SFX e t  āmies [^iāē]rst is:1dpa0
SFX e t  āties [^iāē]rst is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    [āē]rst is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   [āē]rst is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    [āē]rst is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies [āē]rst is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties [āē]rst is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    [cv]irst is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   [cv]irst is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    [cv]irst is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies [cv]irst is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties [cv]irst is:2dpa0
SFX e st dos    [^i]mst is:1vpa0
SFX e st dies   [^i]mst is:2vpa0
SFX e st dās    [^i]mst is:3xpa0
SFX e st dāmies [^i]mst is:1dpa0
SFX e st dāties [^i]mst is:2dpa0
SFX e st tos    [i]mst is:1vpa0
SFX e st ties   [i]mst is:2vpa0
SFX e st tās    [i]mst is:3xpa0
SFX e st tāmies [i]mst is:1dpa0
SFX e st tāties [i]mst is:2dpa0
