dictionaries/lv_LV/lv_LV.dic
aizirt/IB1^35bJ9i+-& po:darbv14t
aizkraut/8EB135ebJ9(+*- po:darbv14t
aizmīt/09EB%35^Jeb+-*AaIi po:darbv11t
aizrīt/{aib)+-*j po:darbv11a
aizslēgt/8EB035ebJ9(+-&j po:darbv14t
aizšaut/8EB135(ebJ9+j*- po:darbv14t
apbrist/AIB0458Jaeb)$-* po:darbv13t
apjēgt/8EB035ebJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
apliekt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
applūkt/9EB0358J(eb)+-&Aj po:darbv13t
aprast/HIB%457hib$-* po:darbv13t
apskaut/89EB135J(eb*+j- po:darbv14t
aptrīt/9BE%35be^J- po:darbv11t
apvest/FIB0458Jfib)$-* po:darbv11t
ass/SsWi po:lietv6r
atbrist/AIB0458Jaib)$-* po:darbv13t
atdot/FEB0358Jfeb)+*j-
atģist/AIB0458Jaib)$-* po:darbv12t
atkaut/{ebj9(+- po:darbv14t
atmest/HEB0458Jheb)$-* po:darbv11t
atraut/8EB135ebJ9(+*j- po:darbv14t
atsmiet/AEB0358Jaeb)+-*j po:darbv11t
attiekt/{e(b)+%*j- po:darbv14a
augšāmcelt/{8EB035ebJ9()+-*
bīt/{gib*+ - po:darbv15a
brist/AIB0458Jaib)$-* po:darbv13t
cirst/FEB0458Jfeb)$- po:darbv12t
diet/IB^35%bJAai)+- po:darbv14t
elementārobjekts/Oi po:lietv1r
ēst/FIB0458Jfib)$-*j po:darbv11t
gaust/{e(b)+%*j- po:darbv14a
iebrist/AIB0458Jaib)$-* po:darbv13t
iecirst/FEB0458Jfeb)$- po:darbv12t
ieēst/FIB0458Jfib)$-* po:darbv11t
iegult/FEB02358feb-+J*j po:darbv15t
iekost/8EB045$ebJ9(-* po:darbv14t
ielaist/8EB045$ebJ9(-* po:darbv14t
iepazīt/GEB2358geb-^Jj+* po:darbv15t
ierast/HIB%457Jhibj-* po:darbv13t
iesaukt/EB0358ebJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
ieslēgt/8EB035ebJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
iespraukt/7EB035ebJ9(+-&j po:darbv14t
iešaut/8EB135(ebJ9+*j- po:darbv14t
iešķirt/AIB1^35Jaib&j+!- po:darbv14t
ievīt/AIB0358Jaib)+-* po:darbv11t
iežmiegt/8EB035ebJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
izbīt/{gib*+ - po:darbv15a
izbrist/AIB0458Jaib)$-* po:darbv13t
izdīkt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
izēst/FIB0458Jfib)$-*j po:darbv11t
izkaukt/7EB035ebJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
izņirgt/8EB035ebJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
izskriet/AEB0358Jaeb+-*1F po:darbv13t
izteikt/8EB035ebJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
kliegt/8EB035ebJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
krišnaīts/Oi po:lietv1r
kultūršoks/Oi po:lietv1r
lūgt/8EB035ebJ9()+-* po:darbv14t
mīt/09EB%35^Jeb+-*AaIi po:darbv11t
nobīt/{gib*+ - po:darbv15a
noburt/8EB135ebJ9(+-* po:darbv14t
nojūgt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
nomākt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
nosegt/8EB035ebJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
nospriest/8EB045$ebJ9(-* po:darbv14t
notrenkt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
novīt/AIB0358Jaib)+-* po:darbv11t
ņirgt/8EB035ebJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
pabrist/AIB0458Jaib)$-* po:darbv13t
paēst/FIB0458Jfib)$-* po:darbv11t
palaist/8EB045$ebJ9(-* po:darbv14t
pārbīt/{gib*+ - po:darbv15a
pārburt/8EB135ebJ9(+-* po:darbv14t
pārirt/IB1^35bJ9i+-& po:darbv14t
pārkult/8EB035ebJ9()+-* po:darbv14t
pārrūkt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
pārspurgt/8EB035ebJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
pāršķirt/AIB1^35Jaib&j+!- po:darbv14t
pārvērst/AEB1458J$aeb!$*j- po:darbv11t
pārvīt/AIB0358Jaib)+-* po:darbv11t
paspraukt/7EB035ebJ9(+-&j po:darbv14t
pavelt/8EB035ebJ9(+-* po:darbv14t
pavest/FIB0458Jfib)$-*j po:darbv11t
pieēst/FIB0458Jfib)$-*j po:darbv11t
pieirt/IB1^35bJ9i+-& po:darbv14t
piekult/8EB035ebJ9()+-* po:darbv14t
piemīt/09EB%35^Jeb+-*AaIi po:darbv11t
pieriebt/8EB035ebJ9()+-& po:darbv14t
piesteigt/8EB035ebJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
pievest/FIB0458Jfib)$-*j po:darbv11t
pievīt/AIB0358Jaib)+-* po:darbv11t
pīt/9EB%35^J(eb+-* po:darbv11t
pusass/SsWi po:lietv6r
sabīt/{gib*+ - po:darbv15a
sabļaut/8EB135ebJ9(+-j po:darbv14t
saēst/FIB0458Jfib)$-*j po:darbv11t
sairt/IB1^35bJ9i+-& po:darbv14t
sakaukt/7EB035ebJ9(+-& po:darbv14t
samest/HEB0458Jjheb)$-* po:darbv11t
samīt/09EB%35^Jeb+-*AaIi po:darbv11t
sarast/HIB%457Jhib$-* po:darbv13t
sarīt/AIB0358Jeb)+-* po:darbv11t
saspiest/8EB045$ebJ9(-* po:darbv14t
satraukt/7EB035ebJ9(+-j& po:darbv14t
savīt/AIB0358Jaib)+-* po:darbv11t
siet/FEB0358Jfeb+-* po:darbv13t
spiest/8EB045$ebJ9(-* po:darbv14t
šķirt/AIB1^35bJaib&j+!- po:darbv14t
šķīt/9EB%35^Jeb)-* po:darbv11t
uzcelt/8EB035ebJ9()+-*j po:darbv14t
uzēst/FIB0458Jfib)$-*j po:darbv11t
uzmaukt/7EB035ebJ9(+-* po:darbv14t
uzrast/HIB%457Jhib$-* po:darbv13t
uzspiest/EB045$ebJ9(-* po:darbv14t
uzvest/FIB0458Jfib)$-*j po:darbv11t
uzvīt/AIB0358Jaib)+-* po:darbv11t
uzziest/8EB045$ebJ9(-* po:darbv14t
vest/FIB0458Jfib)$*j- po:darbv11t
